Georgia, session 2025_26, SB53.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 1 of Chapter 2 of Title 35 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
general provisions relative to the department of public safety, is amended by adding a new
Code section to read as follows:
"35-2-17.
Subject to appropriations by the General Assembly or receipt of other funding for such
purpose, the department shall establish a program to educate the public on the safe storage
of firearms and to promote such safe storage. Such program may include information
including, but not limited to, any laws relating to storing a firearm and preventing persons
under 18 years of age from accessing a firearm. The department shall be authorized to
S. B. 53
- 1 -

LC 39 4488
coordinate with the Department of Education in the development of materials providing
information on best practices for firearm storage for distribution of such materials in
schools. The department shall be authorized to accept federal funds granted by Congress
or executive order for the purposes of this Code section; provided, however, that any
acceptance and use of federal funds shall not commit state funds and shall not place an
obligation upon the General Assembly to continue the purposes for which the federal funds
are made available."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 53
- 2 -